Wyoming, session 2025, HB0021.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) For school year 2025-2026 and each school year
thereafter, the education resource block grant model, as
defined in W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xiv), shall not include a
factor for a school district's operating expenditures when
computing the maintenance worker base full-time equivalent
HB0021

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0154
position resources through the routine maintenance and
operations component as contained in paragraph (b)(xxxiii)
of "Attachment A" as referenced in W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii).
Except as specifically provided under subsection (b) of
this section, for school year 2025-2026 and each school
year thereafter, the maintenance worker resources provided
through the routine maintenance and operations component
within the education resource block grant model shall be
computed in the same manner as school year 2024-2025.

(b) For school year 2025-2026 and each school year
thereafter, the education resource block grant model's
maintenance worker base full-time equivalent position
resources contained within the routine maintenance and
operations component shall be calculated using the average
of the following three (3) factors:

(i) One and one-tenth (1.1) maintenance workers
per school building;

(ii) One (1) maintenance worker multiplied by
the total of the allowable gross square footage of
education space for the school building in accordance with
HB0021

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0154
W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(G)(II) divided by sixty thousand
(60,000), then multiplied by a factor of one and two-tenths
(1.2);

(iii) One (1) maintenance worker multiplied by
the total average daily membership for the school building
divided by one thousand (1,000), then multiplied by a
factor of one and three-tenths (1.3). "Average daily
membership" means as defined by W.S. 21-13-101(a)(i).

Section 2. There is appropriated two million dollars
($2,000,000.00) from the public school foundation program
account to the department of education-school finance for
routine maintenance payments to school districts made
necessary by the amendments enacted in section 1 of this
act. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning
July 1, 2025 and ending June 30, 2026. This appropriation
shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose
and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2026. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation be included in the standard budget for the
HB0021

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0154
department of education-school finance for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0021